New York, session 2025-2026, A6534.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1399-ii-1 of the public health law, as added by 2 section 11 of part EE of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 1399-ii-1. Electronic cigarette and vaping prevention, awareness and 5 control program. The commissioner shall, in consultation and collab- 6 oration with the commissioner of education, establish and develop an 7 electronic cigarette and vaping prevention, control and awareness 8 program within the department. Such program shall be designed to educate 9 students, parents and school personnel about the health risks associated 10 with vapor product use and control measures to reduce the prevalence of 11 vaping, particularly among persons less than twenty-one years of age. 12 Such program shall include, but not be limited to, the creation of age- 13 appropriate instructional tools and materials that [may] shall be used 14 by all schools, and marketing and advertising materials to discourage 15 electronic cigarette use. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 19 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 20 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10224-01-5